Utah statutes.
76-10-1220.   Change of registered office or agent by film distributor.

A distributor qualified to distribute films in this state may change its registered office or registered agent in accordance with Title 16, Chapter 17, Model Registered Agents Act.



Amended by Chapter 43, 2010 General Session

